Utah statutes.
10-1-112.   Headings do not limit sections.
Title, chapter, part, or section headings contained herein shall not be deemed
to govern, limit, modify or in any manner affect the scope, meaning or intent
of the provisions of any title, chapter, part or section of this act.
